Utah statutes.
63J-4a-602.   Rulemaking authority.

The office may make rules, pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that establish policies, procedures, and practices, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, relating to:

(1)  inspecting and monitoring the state Medicaid Program;

(2)  discovering and investigating potential fraud, waste, or abuse in the State Medicaid program;

(3)  developing and implementing the principles and standards described in Subsection 63J-4a-202(1)(p);

(4)  auditing, inspecting, and evaluating the functioning of the division under Subsection 63J-4a-202(1)(h);

(5)  conducting an audit under Subsection 63J-4a-202(1)(h) or (2); or

(6)  ordering a hold on the payment of a claim for reimbursement under Section 63J-4a-205.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2011 General Session

